Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3000.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 3-7 of the General Laws entitled "Retail Licenses" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
3-7-30. Licensed retailers to provide drink covers upon request.
(a) All holders of retail licenses authorized to sell intoxicating beverages to customers for
the purpose of onsite consumption shall upon request, provide a lid with a customer’s drink. For
purposes of this section, “lid” means a removable cover of any size that attaches to the rim of a
corresponding beverage container. The lid is not required to fit all containers in which alcoholic
beverages are served on the premises but shall fit at least one.
(b) The licensee may charge an additional fee for providing a lid with a customer’s drink,
which shall not exceed a reasonable amount based on the wholesale cost of those lids.
(c) This section does not prevent a licensee from offering lids to their customers free of
charge.
(d) A sole violation of this section shall result in a warning by the department for the first
offense.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC005090/SUB B
========